Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.130

Planning agency—Meetings.

Each planning agency shall hold not less than one regular meeting in each month: PROVIDED, That if no matters over which the planning agency has jurisdiction are pending upon its calendar, a meeting may be canceled.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.130. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 13.]